Hawaii, session 2026, HB2486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that solar energy has become one of the most cost-effective and clean energy sources in the world.  Hawaii has long capitalized on the State's abundant sunlight by using large-scale solar farms to power electric utilities and rooftop solar systems to serve individual households.  Hawaii currently leads the nation in rooftop solar installations per capita, and advancements in technology continue to make solar energy more accessible and affordable for the State's residents. The legislature further finds that portable solar generation devices, also known as "balcony solar" or "plug-in solar" devices, offer new opportunities for families to generate their own electricity.  These devices are particularly advantageous to residents of apartments, other rental properties, and small businesses. Apartment residents can safely install units on balconies or patios, and renters can easily relocate their systems when they move to a new home. The legislature recognizes that portable solar generation devices have significantly lower upfront costs than rooftop solar systems and can be installed by consumers without any specialized training.  A typical portable solar generation device costs less than $2,500. Although the devices produce less electricity than typical rooftop solar systems, they can supply enough power to operate common household appliances like lights, televisions, computers, and refrigerators.  The devices can help offset residents' consumption of electricity and help save on customers' electricity bills. The legislature notes that a portable solar generation device is installed by plugging it in to a standard household electricity outlet. Electricity generated by the device is used by appliances connected to the home's other outlets.  Built-in safety features prevent electricity from flowing onto the grid during a power outage, and any surplus energy generated cannot be sold to the electric utility. The legislature also notes that, while surplus energy cannot be sold, it can be stored in a battery, which allows users to save electricity produced during the day for use at night or at other times when there is little sun. Although batteries remain relatively expensive, costs are decreasing, and combining these systems can yield long-term savings on a household's overall electricity expenses and provide benefits to the electric grid. The legislature believes that establishing a clear regulatory framework for portable solar generation devices will help encourage safe and efficient use of the devices; expand access to clean, renewable energy; promote equity among electricity consumers; lower electricity bills; and advance Hawaii's clean energy goals. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish standards and registration requirements for the use of portable solar generation devices in the State. SECTION 2.  Chapter 269, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§269-     Portable solar generation devices.  (a) Each portable solar generation device used in the State shall be: (1)  Exempt from the net metering program requirements set out in part VI of this chapter, any reliability standards and interconnection requirements established pursuant to section 269-143, and procedures for interconnection established pursuant to section 269‑145; (2)  Eligible for installation and use by an electric utility customer without: (A)  Obtaining the electric utility company's approval; (B)  Paying to the electric utility company any fee or charge related to the use of the device; or (C)  Installing any controls or equipment beyond the controls or equipment that are integrated into the device; and (3)  Registered with the public utilities commission under section 269-   . (b)  The maximum aggregate rated power output of all portable solar generation devices connected to the electrical meter shall not exceed one thousand two hundred watts. (c)  No electric utility company shall be liable for any damage or injury caused by a portable solar generation device. §269-     Portable solar generation devices; registration.  The public utilities commission shall establish and maintain an online system for registration of portable solar generation devices; provided that the public utilities commission may delegate this responsibility to any person or organization.  No customer shall be required to pay a fee to register a portable solar generation device." SECTION 3.  Section 269-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new definition to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Portable solar generation device" means a movable photovoltaic generation device that: (1)  Has a maximum aggregate rated power output of one thousand two hundred watts; (2)  Is designed to be connected to a building's electrical system through a standard one hundred twenty-volt alternating current outlet; (3)  Is intended primarily to offset part of the customer's consumption of electricity from an electric utility company; (4)  Includes a mechanism to prevent the device from energizing the electric utility's distribution system during a power outage; and (5)  Is certified by Underwriters Laboratories, Inc. to meet standard UL 3700, or an equivalent nationally recognized testing laboratory, as recognized by the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration, or each part of the device is so certified." SECTION 4.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.